District of Columbia statutes.
29-603.05

Partnership liable for partner’s actionable conduct.

(a)

A partnership shall be liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a partner acting in the ordinary course of business of the partnership or with authority of the partnership.

(b)

If, in the course of the partnership’s business or while acting with authority of the partnership, a partner receives or causes the partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a partner, the partnership shall be liable for the loss.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 33-103.05.
1981 Ed., § 41-153.5.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 305 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).